District of Columbia statutes.
7-2037

Variances.

An applicant operating a child development facility prior to July 1, 1975, may be granted a variance from the physical or structural requirements of any rule adopted pursuant to this subchapter upon a determination by the Mayor that full compliance would result in exceptional and undue hardship. Any variance shall be granted in accordance with procedures established by rule.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 8, 46 DCR 274
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.
See notes to § 7-2031.
1981 Ed., § 6-3627.